Utah statutes.
62A-15-620.   Attempt to commit person contrary to requirements -- Penalty.

Any person who attempts to place another person in the custody of a local mental health authority contrary to the provisions of this part is guilty of a class B misdemeanor, in addition to liability in an action for damages, or subject to other criminal charges.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 8, 2002 Special Session 5

